District of Columbia statutes.
47-317.07

SHARE Data Center.

Notwithstanding any other law, all positions, personnel, property, records, and the functions of the Office of Financial Information Services for the SHARE data center are assigned, and authority delegated, to the Office of the Chief Technology Officer.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2102, 47 DCR 6308

History